Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.1310

Approval of merger.

(1) A plan of merger is not effective unless it has been approved by a domestic merging limited cooperative association as provided in RCW 23.100.0418.

(2) A merger involving a domestic merging cooperative association that is not a limited cooperative association is not effective unless the merger is approved by that cooperative association in accordance with its organic law.

(3) A merger involving a foreign merging cooperative association is not effective unless the merger is approved by the foreign cooperative association in accordance with the law of the foreign cooperative association's jurisdiction of formation.

[ 2019 c 37 s 1310.]